Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2839.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "County Road and
Bridge Funding Incentive Act of 2025".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.901 of Title 68, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 11146 Page 1

A. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and
ending not later than December 31, 2031, there shall be allowed as a
credit against the tax imposed pursuant to Section 2355 of Title 68
of the Oklahoma Statutes upon the taxable income of natural persons,
for a qualified donation made by a natural person acting in their
individual capacity to a county for deposit into its County Road and
Bridge Incentive Account of its donation fund as follows:
1. One hundred percent (100%) of the amount of the donation to
a county with a population of less than twenty-five thousand
(25,000) persons;
2. Seventy-five percent (75%) of the amount of the donation to
a county with a population of at least twenty-five thousand (25,000)
persons but not more than fifty thousand (50,000) persons;
3. Fifty percent (50%) of the amount of the donation to a
county with a population of at least fifty thousand (50,000) persons
but not more than seventy-five thousand (75,000) persons; or
4. Twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount of the donation to a
county with a population of more than seventy-five thousand (75,000)
persons, but not more than one hundred thousand (100,000) persons.
B. No tax credit otherwise authorized by this section shall be
claimed for a donation to a county having a population in excess of
one hundred thousand (100,000) persons.


Req. No. 11146 Page 2

C. All population determinations required by this section shall
be governed by the Federal Decennial Census or most recent
population estimate based on the date of the donation.
D. The credit authorized by this section shall not be used to
reduce the tax liability of the taxpayer to less than zero (0).
E. The credit otherwise authorized by this section may only be
used by a natural person for a donation made by that natural person
in their individual capacity and shall not be claimed by any other
legal entity.
F. To the extent not used the credit authorized by this section
may be carried over, in order, to each of the five (5) succeeding
taxable years.
G. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and
ending not later than December 31, 2031, the total amount of credits
authorized by this section used to offset tax shall be adjusted
annually to limit the annual amount of credits to Twenty-five
Million Dollars ($25,000,000.00). The Tax Commission shall annually
calculate and publish a percentage by which the credits authorized
by this section shall be reduced so the total amount of credits used
to offset tax does not exceed Twenty-five Million Dollars
($25,000,000.00) per year. The formula to be used for the
percentage adjustment shall be Twenty-five Million Dollars
($25,000,000.00) divided by the credits used to offset tax in the
second preceding year.
Req. No. 11146 Page 3

H. Pursuant to subsection G of this section, in the event the
total tax credits authorized by this section exceed Twenty-five
Million Dollars ($25,000,000.00) in any calendar year, the Tax
Commission shall permit any excess over Twenty-five Million Dollars
($25,000,000.00), but shall factor such excess into the percentage
adjustment formula for subsequent years.
I. Each county treasurer of the county to which a donation can
be made to qualify for the tax credit authorized by this section
shall create within the county donation fund an account to be
designated the "County Road and Bridge Incentive Account" and any
donation made to the county by a natural person for the purpose of
qualifying for the income tax credit authorized by this section
shall be credited to such account. No funds in the account may be
used to acquire new equipment, but may be used for repairs to
existing equipment acquired with other funds of the county or
acquired by other methods. The balance of the account may be used
by the county for improvements to county roads or bridges in
accordance with other requirements of law governing such
expenditure.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective January 1, 2026.

60-1-11146 MJ 12/23/24


Req. No. 11146 Page 4